Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Chapter 60. State Programs.

Administrative Code. —

For division of community and business development, see 3 AAC, part 16.

Secs. 29.60.010 — 29.60.080.
State equalization of tax resources for municipal services; determination of population; determination of millage rate equivalent; reports; limitation on computation and use of payments; tax equalization account; administration; definitions. [Repealed, § 14 ch 12 SLA 2008.]

Secs. 29.60.100 — 29.60.180.
State Aid for Miscellaneous Purposes. [Repealed, § 14 ch 12 SLA 2008.]

Secs. 29.60.280 — 29.60.310.
Allocation and distribution; qualification for minimum payment; proration of payments; time of payment. [Repealed, § 14 ch 12 SLA 2008.]

Secs. 29.60.350 — 29.60.375.
Safe communities program; base amount account distributions; municipalities organized under federal law; per capita account distribution; minimum entitlement; adjustment of payments; definition. [Repealed, § 14 ch 12 SLA 2008.]